Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
Conservation Easements

382.800.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

382.810

to

382.860

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Conservation easement” means a nonpossessory interest of a holder in real property imposing limitations or affirmative obligations, the purposes of which include retaining or protecting natural, scenic, or open-space values of real property, assuring its availability for agricultural, forest, recreational, or open-space use, protecting natural resources, maintaining or enhancing air or water quality, or preserving the historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural aspects of real property.

“Holder” means:

A governmental body empowered to hold an interest in real property under the laws of this state or the United States; or

A charitable corporation, charitable association, or charitable trust, the purposes or powers of which include retaining or protecting the natural, scenic, or open-space values of real property, assuring the availability of real property for agricultural, forest, recreational, or open-space use, protecting natural resources, maintaining or enhancing air or water quality, or preserving the historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural aspects of real property.

“Third-party right of enforcement” means a right provided in a conservation easement to enforce any of its terms granted to a governmental body, charitable corporation, charitable association, or charitable trust, which, although eligible to be a holder, is not a holder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 251, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Journal of Mineral Law & Policy.

Comments, Preservation of Kentucky's Diminishing Farmland: A Statutory Analysis, 5 J.M.L. & P. 305 (1989-90).

Journal of Natural Resources & Environmental Law.

Articles, Private Land Use Controls and Biodiversity Preservation in Kentucky, 11 J. Nat. Resources & Envtl. L. 281 (1995-96).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Easements, § 316.00.

382.810.
Creation — Acceptance and recordation necessary — Duration — Preexisting property interest.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

382.810

to

382.860

, a conservation easement may be created, conveyed, recorded, assigned, released, modified, terminated, or otherwise altered or affected in the same manner as other easements.

No right or duty in favor of or against a holder and no right in favor of a person having a third-party right of enforcement shall arise under a conservation easement before its acceptance by the holder and a recordation of the acceptance.

Except as provided in KRS 382.820(2), a conservation easement shall be unlimited in duration unless the instrument creating it otherwise provides.

An interest in real property in existence at the time a conservation easement is created shall not be impaired by it unless the owner of the interest is a party to the conservation easement or consents to it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 251, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.

382.820.
Actions affecting easements.

An action affecting a conservation easement may be brought by:

An owner of an interest in the real property burdened by the easement;

A holder of the easement;

A person having a third-party right of enforcement; or

A person authorized by other law.

KRS

382.810

to

382.860

shall not affect the power of a court to modify or terminate a conservation easement in accordance with the principles of law and equity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

382.830.
Validity of easement.

A conservation easement shall be valid even though:

It is not appurtenant to an interest in real property;

It can be or has been assigned to another holder;

It is not of a character that has been recognized traditionally at common law;

It imposes a negative burden;

It imposes affirmative obligations upon the owner of an interest in the burdened property or upon the holder;

The benefit does not touch or concern real property; or

There is no privity of estate or of contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 15, 1988.

382.840.
Applicability and effect.

KRS

382.800

to

382.860

shall apply to any interest created after July 15, 1988, which complies with KRS

382.800

to

382.860

, whether designated as a conservation easement or as a covenant, equitable servitude, restriction, easement, or otherwise.

KRS

382.800

to

382.860

shall apply to any interest created before July 15, 1988, if it would have been enforceable had it been created after July 15, 1988, unless retroactive application contravenes the constitution or laws of this state or the United States.

KRS

382.800

to

382.860

shall not invalidate any interest, whether designated as a conservation or preservation easement or as a covenant, equitable servitude, restriction, easement, or otherwise, that is enforceable under other law of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 251, § 5, effective July 15, 1988.

382.850.
Transfer of easement — Effect on mining operations and on eminent domain powers.

A conservation easement shall not be transferred by owners of property in which there are outstanding subsurface rights without the prior written consent of the owners of the subsurface rights.

A conservation easement shall not operate to limit, preclude, delete or require waivers for the conduct of coal mining operations, including the transportation of coal, upon any part or all of adjacent or surrounding properties; and shall not operate to impair or restrict any right or power of eminent domain created by statute, and all such rights and powers shall be exercisable as if the conservation easement did not exist.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 251, § 6, effective July 15, 1988.

382.860.
Application and construction — Uniformity of interpretation.

KRS

382.800

to

382.860

shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws with respect to conservation easements among states enacting them.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 251, § 7, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Easements, § 316.00.